Hawaii statutes.
§11-94 Exemptions of voters on election
day. Every voter shall be privileged from arrest on election day while at
the voter's polling place and in going to and returning therefrom, except in
case of breach of the peace then committed, or in case of treason or felony. [L
1970, c 26, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next